Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TRAFFIC SAFETY CAMPAIGN MESSAGES.new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "changeable message sign" means a traffic control device that is capable of displaying one or more alternative messages on or alongside a roadway; new text end new text begin (2) "commissioner" means the commissioner of transportation; and new text end new text begin (3) "traffic safety campaign message" or "traffic safety campaign language" means the display of a message or alert on a changeable message sign to provide road users information about traffic operation, regulations, warnings, guidance, or communications about a currently present and known threat or danger to public safety or the motoring public. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding the requirements of the Minnesota Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices established by the commissioner of transportation under Minnesota Statutes, section 169.06, subdivision 2, by July 1, 2025, the commissioner must incorporate and implement the standards and guidance of section 2L.07 of the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for Streets and Highways, 11th Edition, as incorporated by the United States Department of Transportation, pertaining to traffic safety campaign messages on changeable message signs. new text end new text begin (c) Traffic safety campaign language on a changeable message sign must only: new text end new text begin (1) provide relevant information to road users and minimize confusion and visual and cognitive distraction; and new text end new text begin (2) convey a clear and simple message without witticisms, colloquialisms, neologisms, portmanteaus, hashtags, electronic or Internet shorthand or slang, popular culture references that target or are comprehended by a limited segment of the driving population, or any other message relying on hidden meanings, targeted cultural knowledge, or unconventional syntax to understand the message. new text end new text begin (d) Where practicable, the commissioner must ensure that a traffic safety campaign message displayed on a changeable message board is part of a broader traffic safety effort that uses other media forms as its primary means of outreach. The commissioner is prohibited from soliciting public suggestions for the content of changeable message boards. new text end new text begin (e) Paragraph (b) expires upon adoption of relevant revisions to the Minnesota Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices that pertain to traffic safety campaign messages on changeable message signs. The commissioner must notify the revisor of statutes, whether electronically or in writing, of the expiration. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end